Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.070

Chapter as alternative.

The provisions of this chapter shall be deemed as alternatives to, and not be limited by, the provisions of RCW 39.33.010, 36.34.130, and 36.35.140, nor shall the authority granted in this chapter be held to be subjected to or qualified by the terms of such statutory provisions.

[ 1998 c 106 s 22; 1972 ex.s. c 150 s 8.]